en: cocoa fiber
af: Kakaovezel
bg: какаови фибри
ca: fibra de cacau
de: Kakaofaser
es: fibra de cacao
et: kakaokiud
fi: kaakaokuitu
fr: fibre de cacao
hr: kakaova vlakna
hu: kakaórost
it: fibra di cacao
ja: カカオ繊維
mk: какаови влакна
nl: cacaovezel
pl: błonnik kakaowy
ru: какао-волокна
sq: rrënjë kakaoje
sv: kakaofiber
uk: какао-волокна
zh: 可可纤维

en: cocoa shell nibs
sv: kakaoskalsbitar

en: cocoa bar
hr: kakaova ploča
it: barretta di cacao

en: chocolate
af: Sjokolade
am: ቸኮላታ
an: Chicolate
ar: شوكولاتة
az: Şokolad
ba: Шоколад
be: Шакалад
bg: шоколад
bn: চকলেট
br: Chokolad
bs: Čokolada
ca: xocolata
ce: Шоколад
cs: čokoláda
cy: siocled
da: chokolade
de: Schokolade
el: σοκολάτα
eo: ĉokolado
es: chocolate
et: šokolaad
eu: Txokolate
fa: شکلات
fi: suklaa
fo: sjokuláta
fr: chocolat
fy: sûkelarje
ga: Seacláid
gd: Teòclaid
gl: Chocolate
gn: Chokora
gu: ચોકલિટ્
gv: shocklaid
he: שוקולד
hi: चॉकलेट
hr: čokolada, čokoladni, čokolade, okusa čokolade
ht: chokola
hu: csokoládé
hy: Շոկոլադ
ia: Chocolate
id: Cokelat
io: Chokolado
is: Súkkulaði
it: cioccolato, cioccolata
ja: チョコレート
jv: Coklat
ka: შოკოლადი
kk: Шоколад
km: ស៊ុកូឡា
kn: ಚಾಕಲಿಟ್
ko: 초콜릿
ky: Шоколад
la: Socolata
lb: sjoekelaat
ln: Sokolá
lo: ໂຊໂກລາ
lt: Šokoladas
lv: šokoladas
mg: sokola
mi: tiakarete
mk: чоколадо
ml: ചോക്കലേറ്റ്
mn: Шоколад
mr: चॉकलेट
ms: coklat
mt: ċikkulata
my: ချောကလက်
nb: sjokolade
ne: चकलेट
nl: chocola, chocolade
nn: sjokolade
oc: Chocolat
or: ଚୋକୋଲେଟ
os: Шоколад
pa: ਚਾਕਲੇਟ
pl: czekolada, czekolady, czekolad, czekoladowy, czekoladowa, czekoladowe
pt: chocolate
qu: Chukulati
ro: ciocolata
ru: шоколад
sd: چاڪليٽ
sh: Čokolada
si: චොකලට්
sk: čokoláda
sl: Čokolada
sm: sukalati
so: Chocolate
sq: çokollata
sr: чоколада
st: tshokolete
su: Coklat
sv: choklad
sw: Chokoleti
ta: சாக்கலேட்
te: చాక్లెట్
tg: Шакалод
th: ช็อกโกแลต
tk: Şokolad
tl: Tsokolate
tr: Çikolata
tt: Шоколад
uk: шоколад
ur: چاکلیٹ
uz: shokolad
vi: sô-cô-la
wo: sokolaa
yi: שאקאלאד
zh: 巧克力
zu: shokoledi

en: belgian chocolate
de: belgische Schokolade
es: chocolate belga
fr: chocolat belge
hr: belgijska čokolada
it: cioccolato belga
nl: Belgische chocolade
ro: ciocolată belgiană

en: chocolate powder
bg: шоколад на прах
ca: xocolata en pols
da: chokoladepulver
de: Schokoladenpulver
es: chocolate en polvo
fi: suklaajauhe
fr: chocolat en poudre, poudre de chocolat
it: cioccolato in polvere
nl: chocoladepoeder
pt: Chocolate em pó
ro: ciocolata pudra
ru: Шоколадный порошок
sv: Chokladpulver
zh: 巧克力粉

en: chocolate chunk, chocolate chunks, chocolate pieces, chocolate chips, semisweet Chocolate Chips
bg: парченца шоколад, шоколадов чипс, шоколадови парчета
ca: xips de xocolata
cs: kousky čokolády
da: Chokoladestykker, stykker af chokolade
de: Schokoladenstücke, Schokoladenstückchen
es: copos de chocolate, pepitas de chocolate, gotas de chocolate, chips de chocolate
fi: suklaapalat, suklaarouhe
fr: morceaux de chocolat, pépites de chocolat, copeaux de chocolat
he: שברי שוקולד, נטיפי שוקולד, שוקולד צ׳יפס, שוקולד צ'יפס, חתיכות שוקולד
it: pezzi di cioccolato, gocce di cioccolato
nl: Chocostukjes
pl: Kawałki czekolady
pt: raspas de chocolate
sv: Choklad bitar, chokladbitar

en: chocolate paste
hr: pasta od čokolade
it: pasta di cioccolato

en: chocolate-flavored paste with ground cocoa biscuits
hr: pasta okusa čokolade s mljevenim kakao keksima

en: milk chocolate chips, milk chocolate drops
da: mælkechokoladestykker
de: Milchschokoladenstücke
es: pepitas de chocolate con leche
fi: maitosuklaapalat
fr: Flocons de chocolat au lait
it: scaglie di cioccolato al latte, gocce di cioccolato al latte
nb: melkesjokoladedråper
sv: mjölkchokladdroppar

en: sugar free chocolate
hr: čokolada bez šećera
it: cioccolato senza zucchero

en: sugar free chocolate chips
de: zuckerfreie Schokoladenstücke
es: chispas de chocolate sin azucar
fr: pépites de chocolat sans sucre
hr: čokoladni čips bez šećera
it: gocce di cioccolato senza zucchero

en: chocolate filling, filling cream with chocolate
de: Schokoladenfüllung
es: Relleno de chocolate
fi: suklaatäyte
fr: fourrage au chocolat, fourrage chocolat
hr: keks s kakaom, punilo okusa čokolade, punjenje okusa čokolade
it: ripieno al cioccolato
pl: nadzienie czekoladowe

en: chocolate flavor filling with pieces of coconut
hr: punjenje okusa čokolade s komacičima kokosa
it: ripieno al gusto di cioccolato con pezzetti di cocco

en: pure cocoa butter chocolate
de: Schokolade aus reiner Kakaobutter
es: chocolate de pura manteca de cacao
fr: chocolat pur beurre de cacao
hr: čokolada s čistim kakao maslacem
it: cioccolato puro burro di cacao
nl: chocolade met pure cacaoboter

en: chocolate cream
de: Schokoladencreme, Schokoladen-Crème
es: crema de chocolate
fr: Crème de chocolat
hr: čokoladna krema
it: crema al cioccolato
pl: krem czekoladowy

en: dark chocolate, black chocolate, plain chocolate
ar: شوكولاتة داكنة
be: цёмны шакалад
bg: черен шоколад
bn: ডার্ক চকোলেট
ca: xocolata negra
cs: hořká čokoláda
da: mørk chokolade
de: Bitterschokolade, dunkle Schokolade, Zartbitterschokolade, Zartbitter-Schokolade, Edel-Bitterschokolade
el: μαύρη σοκολάτα
eo: nigra ĉokolado
es: chocolate negro, chocolate amargo
et: tume šokolaad
eu: txokolate beltz
fa: شکلات تلخ
fi: tumma suklaa
fr: chocolat noir
he: שוקולד מריר
hi: डार्क चॉकलेट
hr: tamna čokolada
hu: étcsokoládé
hy: մուգ շոկոլադ
id: cokelat hitam
it: cioccolato fondente
ja: ビターチョコレート
jv: soklat peteng
ka: შავი შოკოლადი
ko: 다크 초콜릿
lv: tumšā šokolāde
mk: темно чоколадо
ml: കറുത്ത ചോക്ലേറ്റ്
ms: coklat hitam
nb: mørk sjokolade, vanlig sjokolade
nl: pure chocola, pure chocolade
nn: mørk sjokolade
or: ଡାର୍କ ଚୋକୋଲେଟ
pa: ਡਾਰਕ ਚੌਕਲੇਟ
pl: gorzka czekolada, czekolada gorzka, czekolada ciemna
pt: chocolate amargo
ru: горький шоколад
sk: horká čokoláda
sl: temna čokolada
sq: çokollatë e zezë
sr: црна чоколада
sv: mörk choklad
th: ดาร์กช็อกโกแลต
tr: bitter çikolata
uk: чорний шоколад
vi: sôcôla đen
zh: 黑巧克力

en: belgian dark chocolate, dark belgian chocolate
de: belgische dunkle Schokolade, dunkle belgische Schokolade
fr: chocolat noir belge
hr: belgijska tamna čokolada
it: cioccolato fondente belga
nl: Belgische pure chocolade

en: dark chocolate chunks, dark chocolate chips
bg: парчета тъмен шоколад
de: Bitterschokoladenstückchen, Zartbitterschokoladenplättchen, Zartbitter-Schokoladenplättchen
es: Trozos de chocolate negro, pepitas de chocolate negro, pedacitos de chocolate negro
fi: tumma suklaarouhe
fr: morceaux de chocolat noir, pépites de chocolat noir, copeaux de chocolat noir
hr: kapljice tamne čokolade
it: pezzetti di cioccolato fondente
nl: stukjes pure chocolade
pl: kawalki czekolady deserowej

en: sugar free dark chocolate chunks
hr: kapljice tamne čokolade bez šećera
it: pezzetti di cioccolato fondente senza zucchero